Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,132
Exemption from Securities Act of Nebraska.

Member interests offered or sold by a limited cooperative association are exempt from the Securities Act of Nebraska to the extent interests offered or sold by other types of organizations are exempt under subdivision (15) of section 8-1111.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 132.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.